Tennessee, session 114, SB2043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 5, Chapter 1, Part 2, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
Notwithstanding a charter provision to the contrary, the county legislative body of
a county with a charter form of government under this part shall not adopt a budget that
reduces the budget for the sheriff below the budgeted amount for the previous fiscal year
for office personnel salaries and benefits or operational expenditures necessary for the
discharge of the sheriff's statutorily mandated duties unless the reduction is approved in
writing by the sheriff.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 5-9-407(b), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (b)(1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (b)(2):
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1), with respect to a sheriff's office budget:
(A) The sheriff may approve or disapprove any budget amendment that
would reduce personnel, operational, or capital expenditures below the level
proposed by the sheriff; and
(B) The county legislative body shall amend a sheriff's budget only upon
the sheriff's written consent or, if the amendment is disapproved by the sheriff
pursuant to subdivision (b)(2)(A), by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the entire county
legislative body.
SB2043
011610
- 1 -

SECTION 3. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can
be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this
act are declared to be severable.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011610